Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2319
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the Nebraska Wheat Resources Act shall be guilty
of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 19, p. 65;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 20;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 10.